src/fst/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
LEXICON ARABICDATEHYPH !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!! This lexicon covers date range constructions: the first part of the range is pointing here,
!! and then it continues after the hyphen to the second part.
 %.%-:%.∑- ARABICDATENUM ;
   %-:∑-   ARABICDATENUM ;
 %.%–:%.%– ARABICDATENUM ; ! en dash
   %–:%–   ARABICDATENUM ; ! en dash
!! The following two lines cover the TTS use case, where we force the FST to split before and after the hyphen,
!! to create separate analyses for each part, and with the hyphen as a separate token in between.
!! This makes it much easier to convert the digits to text, and lay the ground for changing the case of the numbers
!! in each part of the range.
 %.@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:%.@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@∑-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ ARABICDATENUM ;
 %.@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:%.@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ ARABICDATENUM ; ! en dash

LEXICON ARABICDATENUM !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !29.09
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1]  [1|2|%0]            > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !29.10
 < [3]      [1|                %0] %. [%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !31.09
 < [3]      [1|                %0] %. [1]  [1|2|%0]            > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !31.10
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9   ] %.      [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !9.9
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9   ] %. [1]  [1|2|%0]            > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !9.10
 < [1|2]    [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %.      [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !29.9
 < [1|2]    [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1]  [1|2|%0]            > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !29.10
 < [3]      [1|                %0] %.      [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !31.9
 < [3]      [1|                %0] %. [1]  [1|2|%0]            > ARABICDATENUM2 ; !31.10

LEXICON ARABICDATENUM2 !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < %. [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag       ;
 < %.                              [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag       ;
   %.:                                                                             datetag_w_dot_cont ;

LEXICON datetag_w_dot_cont !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot_tag ;
 dateyearcase_fullsuff_tag       ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCK !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is a regex for clock time.

! 2-digit clock time, like 8-16 on a shop sign
! ! 8-16
 < (%0) 1 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] | [2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 2 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |   [3|4|5|6|7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 3 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |     [4|5|6|7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 4 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |       [5|6|7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 5 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |         [6|7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 6 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |           [7|8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 7 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |             [8|9]] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 8 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] |                9 ] > numclock ;
 < (%0) 9 [%-|–|—] [1 [%0|1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ]                    > numclock ;
! 10-12
 <   1 %0 [%-|–|—] [1    [1|2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  1 [%-|–|—] [1      [2|3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  2 [%-|–|—] [1        [3|4|4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  3 [%-|–|—] [1            [4|5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  4 [%-|–|—] [1              [5|6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  5 [%-|–|—] [1                [6|7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  6 [%-|–|—] [1                  [7|8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  7 [%-|–|—] [1                    [8|9] | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  8 [%-|–|—] [1                       9  | 2 [%0|1|2|3|4] ] > numclock ;
 <   1  9 [%-|–|—]                               2 [%0|1|2|3|4]   > numclock ;

! 20-24  
 < 2 %0 [%-|–|—] 2 [1|2|3|4] > numclock ;
 < 2  1 [%-|–|—] 2   [2|3|4] > numclock ;
 < 2  2 [%-|–|—] 2     [3|4] > numclock ;
 < 2  3 [%-|–|—] 2        4  > numclock ;

! 2-digit clock time, first part:
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;

! 4-digit clock time, first part:
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;

LEXICON CLOCK-sep !!≈ * __@CODE@__ different separators for intervals, or one clock time only
          numclock_nospan     ; ! one clock time indication only
 -:∑-     ARABICCLOCK2        ; ! 12.00-12.30   = no space
 –        ARABICCLOCK2        ; ! en dash
 ,:,      ARABICCLOCKDECIMALS ; ! clock time with fractional seconds (e.g. sports)

 -:% ∑-%  ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! 12.00 - 12.30 = space (common)
 -:∑-%    ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! 12.00- 12.30  = inconcistent space (found in corpus)
 -:% ∑-   ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! 12.00 -12.30  = inconcistent space (found in corpus)
 –:% –%   ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! en dash, spaces as above
 –:% –    ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! en dash
 –:–%     ARABICCLOCK2x       ; ! en dash

!! The following lines cover the TTS use case, where we force the FST to split before and after the hyphen,
!! to create separate analyses for each part, and with the hyphen as a separate token in between.
!! This makes it much easier to convert the digits to text, and lay the ground for changing the case of the numbers
!! in each part of the range.
 @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@∑-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ ARABICCLOCK2 ;
 @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ ARABICCLOCK2 ; ! en dash


LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is the second component of intervals, identical to ARABICCLOCK
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;

 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2x !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is the second component of intervals,
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 <          [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCKDECIMALS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is fractional seconds
 <  [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ > numclock_nospan ;

LEXICON ARABICYEAR !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numyear ;

LEXICON numyear !!≈ * __@CODE@__
      yeartag  ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = regular, plain year
 /:/  moreyear ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = slash as year alternative separator
 -:∑- moreyear ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = regular hyphen
 –:–  moreyear ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = EN DASH

!! Variants with spaces on either side, are tagged as Err/Orth:
                     +Use/-TTS–:% –%   moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = EN DASH with space in front and after
 +Use/-PMatch+Use/-GC+Use/-TTS-:% ∑-%  moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = regular hyphen with space in front and after
                     +Use/-TTS–:% –    moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = EN DASH with space in front
                     +Use/-TTS-:% ∑-   moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = regular hyphen with space in front
                     +Use/-TTS–:–%     moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = EN DASH with space after
                     +Use/-TTS-:∑-%    moreyearx ; !!≈ `@CODE@` = regular hyphen with space after

!! The following lines cover the TTS use case, where we force the FST to split before and after the hyphen,
!! to create separate analyses for each part, and with the hyphen as a separate token in between.
!! This makes it much easier to convert the digits to text, and lay the ground for changing the case of the numbers
!! in each part of the range.
 @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%/@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%/@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ moreyear ;
 @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@∑-@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ moreyear ;
 @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@%–@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ moreyear ; ! en dash


LEXICON moreyear !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;

LEXICON moreyearx !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagplx ;
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagplx ;


LEXICON yeartagplx !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Err/Orth:  yeartagpl ;

LEXICON ARABICORD !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                       < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]    > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                                          1%0%0   ARABICLOOPORD ;


!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphone      +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
! + ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;   !
!   ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;

!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneNum    +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneSep ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICCASEphone ;
!
!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneSep     +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!  (                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  )                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  —                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
! %-:∑-                   ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
! %                       ARABICLOOPphoneNum ; ! Space as separator


LEXICON REALARABICDELIMITER  !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1-4 arabics to casesuffixses
            %,       REALARABICDECIM ;
            %-:∑-    REALARABICDECIM ;
            %–       REALARABICDECIM ;
            %-:∑-    REALARABIC      ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
             –:–     REALARABIC      ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers, n-dash
             —:—     REALARABIC      ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers, m-dash
            ,-:,∑-   NUM-ARABICCASES ; ! 10,-
   ,-+Err/Orth:.∑-   NUM-ARABICCASES ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
 % %%+Use/-TTS+Err/Orth:%%    ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%". Use this in non-TTS, it will flag the error
 % @P.Pmatch.Loc@%%+Use/TTS:@P.Pmatch.Loc@%%    ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%". Use this in TTS, it will split in two tokens
 % %%+Use/-TTS:% %%  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc. In TTS, we treat 50 and % as two tokens = easier processing

LEXICON ARABICX
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ [{ x }|{ x }:{ X }|{ × }] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ > ARABICXNORMTAG ; ! Go to the x
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ [{ x }:x|{ x }:X|{ × }:×] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ > ARABICXERRTAG ; ! Go to the x

LEXICON ARABICXNORMTAG
+Num+Arab: # ;

LEXICON ARABICXERRTAG
+Num+Arab+Err/MissingSpace: # ;
